src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NIEJTE_SG
!! ## Inflection for NIEJTE_SG nouns: lexicon `@LEXNAME@`
! -------------------------------------------------------
!
!! Short descrioption of this lexicon, and its purpose.
!
   NIEJTESGNOM ;
   NIEJTESGOBL ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGNOM
 +Nom:e FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON NIEJTESGOBL_NOTPX
!              +Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
!              +Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
!              +Ill:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
!              +Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
!              +Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;     
!              +Com:%>ine     FINAL1 ;
            

LEXICON NIEJTESGOBL
NIEJTESGOBL_Px ; 

              +Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
              +Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
              +Ill:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
              +Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
              +Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;     
     +Ine+Err/Orth:isnie     FINAL1 ;
     +Ela+Err/Orth:istie     FINAL1 ;  
              +Com:%>ine     FINAL1 ;



LEXICON NIEJTE_PL
         +Nom:%>h        FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:%>eh       FINAL1 ; ! do not generate doubleform
+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ijde      FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ijde      FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
+Ela+Err/Orth:%>iste    FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijgujmie FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NIEJTEREST
   EVEN_ESS     ;
   NIEJTE_CMPND ;
   NIEJTE_DER   ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_CMPND
 +Cmp/SgNom:e    R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_DER
         +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Err/Orth:etj  GÅATETJE ;
             +Der2+Der/Car+A:eht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;


LEXICON NIEJTE_COMP
            NIEJTE   ;
         :e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON AARJEL_COMP
        :  EVENCOMP ;
 +Sg+Nom:l FINAL1   ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:l R   ;


!  LEXICON MAAKE !!= @CODE@ Only for "relatives"
!  !! The __@LEXNAME@__ lexicon is used for SUBSTANTIVE_RELATIVES wwhich often has Px.
!     +Der1+Der/Rec+N:e     LAAHKOEH_EVEN ;
!                 +Sg:      NIEJTE_SG     ;
!                 +Pl:      NIEJTE_PL     ;
!                           EVEN_ESS      ;
!           +Cmp/SgNom:e     R             ;
!           +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n  R             ;
!           +Cmp/PlGen:%>i   R             ;
!   +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE      ;

!!€gt-norm: vïelle # Even-syllable test
!!€ vïelle:              vïelle+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vïellese:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ vïelline:            vïelle+N+Sg+Com
!!€ vïelletje:	         vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vïelletjasse:	     vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ vïellemem:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1
!!€ vïelleme:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1
!!€ vïellemdh:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2
!!€ vïellese:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3
!!€ vïellebe:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3

LEXICON ÅERPIENADTJH ! - plural noun
                  +Cmp/SgNom:e                R         ;
                  +Cmp/PlGen:%>i              R         ;
                    +Pl+Nom:%>h              FINAL1    ;
             +Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>eh             FINAL1    ;
                    +Pl+Acc:%>ide            FINAL1    ;
                    +Pl+Gen:%>               IGENSUFF  ;
                    +Pl+Ill:%>ide            FINAL1    ;
                    +Pl+Ine:%>ine            FINAL1    ;
                    +Pl+Ela:%>ijste          FINAL1    ;
                    +Pl+Com:%>igujmie        FINAL1    ;
            +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie        FINAL1    ;
                       +Ess:%>ine            FINAL1    ;
       +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:e%»tj            N_ODD_PL  ;
          +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj            N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:e%»tje           R         ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:e%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;

LEXICON JOVKEMES
+Sg:ass JOVKEMES_Px ;
              +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP3es%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Acc:asse%>m                   FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Gen:asse%>n                   FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Ill:asse%>se                  FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Ine:asse%>sne                 FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Ela:asse%>ste                 FINAL1   ;
              +Sg+Com:ass%>ine                  FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Nom:%>ass%>h                  FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Gen:%>ass%>i                  FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine                FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste              FINAL1   ;
              +Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie            FINAL1   ;
                     :ass                       EVEN_ESS ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMP3es%^DISIMP R        ;
            +Cmp/SgGen:asse%>n                   R        ;
            +Cmp/PlGen:ass%>i                    R        ;


LEXICON NES
+Sg:ass JOVKEMES_Px ;
             +Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Acc:asse%>m                   FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Gen:asse%>n                   FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Ill:asse%>se                  FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Ine:asse%>sne                 FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Ela:asse%>ste                 FINAL1   ;
             +Sg+Com:ass%>ine                  FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Nom:%>ass%>h                  FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Gen:%>ass%>%^DISIMPi          FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine                FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste              FINAL1   ;
             +Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie            FINAL1   ;
                     :ass                       EVEN_ESS ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP R        ;
            +Cmp/SgGen:asse%>n                   R        ;
            +Cmp/PlGen:ass%>i                    R        ;



LEXICON KONTO  !!= ### `@CODE@`
!! Lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems"
 KONTODECL ;

LEXICON KONTODECL
!! ```
               +Sg:     KONTO_SG ; !!= @CODE@
               +Pl:     KONTO_PL ; !!= @CODE@
                        EVEN_ESS ; !!= @CODE@
        +Cmp/SgNom:     R        ; !!= @CODE@
        +Cmp/SgGen:%>n  R        ; !!= @CODE@
        +Cmp/PlGen:%>j  R        ; !!= @CODE@
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj GÅATETJE ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON KONTO_SG
 +Nom:      FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:%>m   FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:%>n   FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>se  FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:%>sne FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:%>ste FINAL1 ;
 +Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;
 
! waiting with the Px forms for these (?) loanwords
!  +Nom+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg2:%>dh FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg3:%>se FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>mem FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg2:%>mdh FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
!  +Gen+PxSg1:%>ne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg1:%>asanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg2:%>asadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1:%>astanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>astadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Com+PxSg2:%>anadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON KONTO_PL
         +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>ide     FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>ide     FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>ine     FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijste   FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON MARS
 +Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! mars
            NIEJTE ; ! marse


LEXICON JUNI
   +Sg+Nom:i    FINAL1      ; !juni
       +Sg:     NIEJTESGOBL ; ! junesne
       +Pl:     NIEJTE_PL   ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:i    R           ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R           ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R           ;
                EVEN_ESS    ;

LEXICON NOM-CMP !nouns with only nominative form and compounding, ex. abredh
+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;


! Sub-paradigm inflections:
! -------------------------
