src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx
åarjel+N+Sem/Cat:åarje AARJEL_COMP ; ! Only in compounds?
åejvieladtjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Group_Hum:åejvieladtj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
åerpienadtjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:åerpienadtj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
aprille+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:april MARS ;
åssjelmes+N+Sem/Dummytag:åssjalm JOVKEMES ;
baarkeldh+N+Sem/Dummytag:baarkeldh NOM-CMP "fläta" ;
barkoefaage+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Edu:barko#faagi JUNI ;
barkoefaage+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Edu:barkoe#faagi JUNI ;
bårremes+N+Sem/Dummytag:bårrem JOVKEMES ;
bïedteres+N+Sem/Food:bïedter NES ;
boetskenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:boetsken NES ;
bollenjes+N+Sem/Dummytag:bollenj NES ;
buaredh+N+Sem/Dummytag:buaredh NOM-CMP ;
byjreskrodth+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:byjres#krodt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
daajh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:daaj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
darjomes+N+Sem/Semcon:darjoem JOVKEMES ;
ersamordva+N+Sem/Lang:ersamordva KONTO ;
faalenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:faalen NES ;
gaajenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:gaajen NES ;
gåangkelmes+N+Sem/Dummytag:gåangkalm JOVKEMES ;
gajjedh+N+Sem/Dummytag:gajjedh NOM-CMP "dag el. vær da man kan høre på lang avstand" ;
garretsïengeles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:garre#tsïengel JOVKEMES ;
geasastahkh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:geasastahk ÅERPIENADTJH ;
goepmeldh+N+Sem/Dummytag:goepmeldh NOM-CMP "morken ved" ;
guektielassjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:guektielassj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
gyjhteles+N+Sem/Prod-ling:gyjhtel NES ;
hapsenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:hapsen NES ;
ïehterdh+N+Sem/Dummytag:ïehterdh NOM-CMP "sidestykke av slakt" ;
jaehkemes+N+Sem/Dummytag:jaehkiem JOVKEMES ;
jïekth+N+Sem/Dummytag:jïekt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
jielemes+N+Sem/Dummytag:jieliem JOVKEMES ;
jïjhteldh+N+Sem/Dummytag:jïjhteldh NOM-CMP "soloppgang" ;
jovkemes+N+Sem/Drink:jovkem JOVKEMES ;
juli+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Time:jul JUNI ;
juni+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Time:jun JUNI ;
klomhpedh+N+Sem/Dummytag:klomhpedh NOM-CMP "klabbeføre" ; !SOUTH
konto+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:konto KONTO ;
krodth+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Substnc:krodt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
krohth+N+Sem/Dummytag:kroht ÅERPIENADTJH ;
kruanesaath+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:kruanes#aat ÅERPIENADTJH ;
lohkemes+N+Sem/Dummytag:lohkem JOVKEMES ; ! lohkemassh= lesestoff
mari+N+Sem/Lang:mari KONTO ;
meänkieli+N+Sem/Dummytag:meän#kieli KONTO ;
meedia+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Org+Use/NotDNorm:meedia KONTO ; !LOANDUBLETT
mineraaledarjomes+N+Sem/Act:mineraale#darjoem JOVKEMES ;
moenjedh+N+Sem/Dummytag:moenjedh NOM-CMP ;
musihkevidejo+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Prod-vis:musihke#videjo KONTO ;
njïhkenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:njïhken NES ;
noerhte+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Plc:noerth NIEJTE_COMP ;
noerhte+N+Sem/Route:noerht NIEJTE_COMP ; !noerhtebe, noerhtebasse, noerhtemes
noerhtelåvledh+N+Sem/Wthr:noerhte#låvledh NOM-CMP "nordøstvind" ;
nugatti+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Food:nuvgadt JUNI ;
nugatti+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Food:nugatt JUNI ;
ossjelmes+N+Sem/Dummytag:ossjelm JOVKEMES ;
paprika+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:paprika KONTO ;
raadijove+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:raadio KONTO ;
raadijove+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Obj-el:radio KONTO ;
reepenjes+N+Sem/Dummytag:reepenj NES ;
såålemes+N+Sem/Dummytag:såålem NES ;
salaami+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:saalam JUNI ;
salaami+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:salaam JUNI ;
sjysnjlassjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjysnjlassj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
skearkedh+N+Sem/Dummytag:skearkedh NOM-CMP ;
snjearkaveareldh+N+Sem/Dummytag:snjearka#veareldh NOM-CMP "duskregn" ; !SOUTH
studijove+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:studio KONTO ;
suehpede+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+Sem/Time:mai MARS ; !OBS, ikke samme ord
sysngelasjh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sysngelasj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
tjåvhtjeles+N+Sem/Dummytag:tjåvhtjel NES ;
tjeerege+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum+Use/NG:tjeereh NOM-CMP ;
vaajes+N+Sem/Dummytag:vaaj JOVKEMES ;
videjove+N+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:videjo KONTO ;
videjove+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:video KONTO ;
voejkenes+N+Sem/Dummytag:voejken NES ;
voeksenassh+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:voeksenass ÅERPIENADTJH ;
